North Dakota, session 69, SB2343.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. Section 4.1-16-08.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and enacted
as follows:
4.1 - 16 - 08.1. Placement or location of a hive - Limitation .
1. A beekeeper may not place or locate a hive within one - half mile [.80 kilometer] from
the nearest edge of a roadway within the state highway system as provided for in
chapter 24 - 01, or a federal highway within this state .
2. If the commissioner receives a complaint alleging a violation of this section, the
commissioner shall:
a. Note the date and time of the complaint;
b. Verify whether the placement or location cited in the complaint is in violation of
subsection 1; and, if so
c. (1) Contact the beekeeper, if known; and
(2) Direct that within forty - eight hours from the time of contact by the
commissioner, the beekeeper remove from the site all colonies, all hives
and content of the hives, and all beekeeping equipment.
3. If the beekeeper fails to meet the requirements of paragraph 2 of subdivision c of
subsection 2 or if the beekeeper is unknown, the agriculture commissioner shall
confiscate all colonies, the hives and content of the hives, and all beekeeping
equipment present at the site. The colonies, the hives and content, and all beekeeping
equipment must be disposed of pursuant to a court order or an administrative order
issued by the commissioner.
Page No. 1 25.0833.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
4. Any costs incurred by the agriculture commissioner in enforcing this section are the
responsibility of the beekeeper.
Page No. 2 25.0833.01000